Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.130

Legislative records—Duties of legislative officials, employees and state archivist—Delivery of records—Custody—Availability.

The legislative committee chair, subcommittee chair, committee member, or employed personnel of the state legislature having possession of legislative records that are not required for the regular performance of official duties shall, within ten days after the adjournment sine die of a regular or special session, deliver all such legislative records to the clerk of the house or the secretary of the senate.

The clerk of the house and the secretary of the senate are charged to include requirements and responsibilities for keeping committee minutes and records as part of their instructions to committee chairs and employees.

The clerk or the secretary, with the assistance of the state archivist, shall classify and arrange the legislative records delivered to the clerk or secretary in a manner that he or she considers best suited to carry out the efficient and economical utilization, maintenance, preservation, and disposition of the records. The clerk or the secretary may deliver to the state archivist all legislative records in his or her possession when such records have been classified and arranged and are no longer needed by either house. The state archivist shall thereafter be custodian of the records so delivered, but shall deliver such records back to either the clerk or secretary upon his or her request.

The chair, member, or employee of a legislative interim committee responsible for maintaining the legislative records of that committee shall, on a scheduled basis agreed upon by the chair, member, or employee of the legislative interim committee, deliver to the clerk or secretary all legislative records in his or her possession, as long as such records are not required for the regular performance of official duties. He or she shall also deliver to the clerk or secretary all records of an interim committee within ten days after the committee ceases to function.

[ 2011 c 336 s 820; 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 5.]